Wyoming, session 2026, SF0105.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 33-28-102(b)(xiii) and
33-28-306(a)(intro) and (vii) and (b)(i) are amended to
read:
33-28-102. Definitions.
(b) As used in this act:
(xiii) "Customer" means a person who has
expressed an interest in buying, selling or leasing real
estate or who attends a showing of real estate without any
agency relationship or a party to a real estate transaction
who has established no intermediary or agency relationship
with any licensee involved in the transaction;
33-28-306. Relationship disclosures.
(a) For purposes of this section, open house
showings, preliminary conversations and requests for
factual information do not constitute discussions or
arrangements incidental to a sale, purchase, exchange or
lease of real estate. Prior to engaging in any discussion
or arrangement incidental to a sale, purchase, exchange or
lease of real estate, and, prior to entering into any
written agreement with a buyer or seller, a licensee shall
make a written disclosure of applicable agency,
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 37, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
intermediary or customer relationships which that shall
contain, at a minimum, all of the following:
(vii) A statement that a customer shall not:
(A) Be required to sign any legal written
agency agreement to view or tour real estate during house
showings;
(B) Be afforded any confidentiality in any
communication to or with the licensee.
(b) The written disclosure shall contain a signature
line for the buyer or seller to acknowledge receipt of the
disclosure. The disclosure and acknowledgment, by itself,
shall not constitute a contract or agreement with the
licensee. Until the buyer or seller executes such
acknowledgment, no representation agreement shall be
executed or valid except, provided if a buyer or seller
refuses to sign the disclosure after presentation by the
licensee:
(i) The licensee may document the refusal with a
signed acknowledgement by the licensee and continue with
the transaction or with providing services to a customer;
and
Section 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
alter, amend or impair any contract or other agreement for
the establishment of an agency, broker or other
relationship between a real estate licensee or broker and a
customer, buyer or seller entered into before the effective
date of this act.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 37, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3